Illinois, session 104th, HB434.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community Service Education Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 60/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Community Service Education Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-904, eff. 6-22-06.)